TagsCloudVisualization/dictionaries/Russian-English.aff
SFX M Y 108
SFX M оть ем оть
SFX M оть ет оть
SFX M оть ете оть
SFX M оть ешь оть
SFX M оть ю оть
SFX M оть ют оть
SFX M оться емся оться
SFX M оться етесь оться
SFX M оться ется оться
SFX M оться ешься оться
SFX M оться юсь оться
SFX M оться ются оться
SFX M ти дем йти
SFX M ти дём йти
SFX M ти дет йти
SFX M ти дёт йти
SFX M ти дете йти
SFX M ти дёте йти
SFX M ти дешь йти
SFX M ти дёшь йти
SFX M ти ду йти
SFX M ти дут йти
SFX M ти ем [зс]ти
SFX M ти ём [зс]ти
SFX M ти ет [зс]ти
SFX M ти ёт [зс]ти
SFX M ти ете [зс]ти
SFX M ти ёте [зс]ти
SFX M ти ешь [зс]ти
SFX M ти ёшь [зс]ти
SFX M ти у [зс]ти
SFX M ти ут [зс]ти
SFX M тись демся йтись
SFX M тись дёмся йтись
SFX M тись детесь йтись
SFX M тись дётесь йтись
SFX M тись дется йтись
SFX M тись дётся йтись
SFX M тись дешься йтись
SFX M тись дёшься йтись
SFX M тись дусь йтись
SFX M тись дутся йтись
SFX M тись емся [зс]тись
SFX M тись ёмся [зс]тись
SFX M тись етесь [зс]тись
SFX M тись ётесь [зс]тись
SFX M тись ется [зс]тись
SFX M тись ётся [зс]тись
SFX M тись ешься [зс]тись
SFX M тись ёшься [зс]тись
SFX M тись усь [зс]тись
SFX M тись утся [зс]тись
SFX M ть ем [ае]ть
SFX M ть ет [ае]ть
SFX M ть ете [ае]ть
SFX M ть ешь [ае]ть
SFX M ть т уть
SFX M ть ю [ае]ть
SFX M ть ют [ае]ть
SFX M ться емся [ае]ться
SFX M ться етесь [ае]ться
SFX M ться ется [ае]ться
SFX M ться ешься [ае]ться
SFX M ться сь уться
SFX M ться юсь [ае]ться
SFX M ться ются [ае]ться
SFX M уть ем уть
SFX M уть ет уть
SFX M уть ете уть
SFX M уть ешь уть
SFX M уть у уть
SFX M уться емся уться
SFX M уться етесь уться
SFX M уться ется уться
SFX M уться ешься уться
SFX M чь ку чь
SFX M чь кут чь
SFX M чься кусь чься
SFX M чься кутся чься
SFX M ыть оем ыть
SFX M ыть оет ыть
SFX M ыть оете ыть
SFX M ыть оешь ыть
SFX M ыть ою ыть
SFX M ыть оют ыть
SFX M ыться оемся ыться
SFX M ыться оетесь ыться
SFX M ыться оется ыться
SFX M ыться оешься ыться
SFX M ыться оюсь ыться
SFX M ыться оются ыться
SFX M ь ем чь
SFX M ь ём чь
SFX M ь ет чь
SFX M ь ёт чь
SFX M ь ете чь
SFX M ь ёте чь
SFX M ь ешь чь
SFX M ь ёшь чь
SFX M ься емся чься
SFX M ься ёмся чься
SFX M ься етесь чься
SFX M ься ётесь чься
SFX M ься ется чься
SFX M ься ётся чься
SFX M ься ешься чься
SFX M ься ёшься чься
SFX M ься ся уться

SFX n Y 1
SFX n 0 ation [^aeiou]l

SFX N Y 2
SFX N 0 ation [^aeiou]l
SFX N 0 ation [^aeiou]m

SFX n Y 1
SFX n 0 ation [^aelry]

SFX N Y 1
SFX N 0 ation [^bdelmrstxy]

SFX n Y 1
SFX n 0 ation [^e]r

SFX N Y 2
SFX N 0 ation [^e]r
SFX N 0 ation [^i]t

SFX n Y 3
SFX n 0 ations [^aeiou]l
SFX n 0 ations [^aelry]
SFX n 0 ations [^e]r

SFX N Y 3
SFX N 0 en [^ey]
SFX N 0 ion [^m]it
SFX N 0 ion [sx]

SFX n Y 1
SFX n 0 lation [aiou]l

SFX N Y 1
SFX N 0 lation [aiou]l

SFX n Y 1
SFX n 0 lations [aiou]l

SFX N Y 1
SFX N 0 mation [aeiou]m

SFX n Y 2
SFX n 0 tion a
SFX n 0 tions a

SFX N Y 14
SFX N 0 а [^ь]
SFX N 0 ам [^ь]
SFX N 0 ами [^ь]
SFX N 0 ах [^ь]
SFX N 0 е [^ь]
SFX N 0 ов [^жцчшщь]
SFX N 0 ом [^жцчшщь]
SFX N 0 у [^ь]
SFX N 0 ю ь
SFX N b ption b
SFX N be ption be
SFX N d sion d
SFX N de sion de
SFX N e ation [^bcdkmst]e

SFX n Y 2
SFX n e ation [^ckt]e
SFX n e ation [iou]te

SFX N Y 1
SFX N e ation [iou]te

SFX n Y 3
SFX n e ations [^ckt]e
SFX n e ations [iou]te
SFX n e ion [^iou]te

SFX N Y 3
SFX N e ion [^iou]te
SFX N e ion [^o]se
SFX N e ion e

SFX n Y 1
SFX n e ions [^iou]te

SFX N Y 3
SFX N e ition ose
SFX N e mation [^u]me
SFX N e ption ume

SFX n Y 1
SFX n e tion ce

SFX N Y 1
SFX N e tion ce

SFX n Y 2
SFX n e tions ce
SFX n el ulsion el

SFX N Y 1
SFX N el ulsion el

SFX n Y 2
SFX n el ulsions el
SFX n er ration er

SFX N Y 1
SFX N er ration er

SFX n Y 2
SFX n er rations er
SFX n ke cation ke

SFX N Y 1
SFX N ke cation ke

SFX n Y 1
SFX n ke cations ke

SFX N Y 1
SFX N t ssion mit

SFX n Y 3
SFX n y ation py
SFX n y ations py
SFX n y ication [^p]y

SFX N Y 1
SFX N y ication y

SFX n Y 1
SFX n y ications [^p]y

SFX N Y 8
SFX N ь ам [жчшщ]ь
SFX N ь ами [жчшщ]ь
SFX N ь ах [жчшщ]ь
SFX N ь ей ь
SFX N ь и ь
SFX N ь ям [^жчшщ]ь
SFX N ь ями [^жчшщ]ь
SFX N ь ях [^жчшщ]ь

SFX O Y 3
SFX O 0 al [^aebcrtxmy]
SFX O 0 al [^ipux]t
SFX O 0 al [^u]m

SFX o Y 3
SFX o 0 ally [^aebcrtxmy]
SFX o 0 ally [^ipux]t
SFX o 0 ally [^u]m

SFX O Y 1
SFX O 0 ial [bcrx]

SFX o Y 1
SFX o 0 ially [bcrx]

SFX O Y 1
SFX O 0 l a

SFX o Y 1
SFX o 0 lly a

SFX O Y 1
SFX O 0 tal [iu]t

SFX o Y 1
SFX o 0 tally [iu]t

SFX O Y 1
SFX O 0 ual [px]t

SFX o Y 1
SFX o 0 ually [px]t

SFX O Y 9
SFX O 0 а ин
SFX O 0 е ин
SFX O 0 ев [анря]ц
SFX O 0 м [ая]
SFX O 0 ми [ая]
SFX O 0 ом ин
SFX O 0 у ин
SFX O 0 х [ая]
SFX O e al [^bcgv]e

SFX o Y 1
SFX o e ally [^bcgv]e

SFX O Y 1
SFX O e ial [bcgv]e

SFX o Y 1
SFX o e ially [bcgv]e

SFX O Y 1
SFX O um al um

SFX o Y 1
SFX o um ally um

SFX O Y 1
SFX O y al ty

SFX o Y 1
SFX o y ally ty

SFX O Y 1
SFX O y ial [^t]y

SFX o Y 1
SFX o y ially [^t]y

SFX O Y 123
SFX O ек ка [жчш]ек
SFX O ек кам [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ками [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ках [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ке [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ки [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ков [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ком [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ку [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ька [лнрс]ек
SFX O ёк ька [лнрс]ёк
SFX O ек ькам [лнрс]ек
SFX O ёк ькам [лнрс]ёк
SFX O ек ьками [лнрс]ек
SFX O ёк ьками [лнрс]ёк
SFX O ек ьках [лнрс]ек
SFX O ёк ьках [лнрс]ёк
SFX O ек ьке [лнрс]ек
SFX O ёк ьке [лнрс]ёк
SFX O ек ьки [лнрс]ек
SFX O ёк ьки [лнрс]ёк
SFX O ек ьков [лнрс]ек
SFX O ёк ьков [лнрс]ёк
SFX O ек ьком [лнрс]ек
SFX O ёк ьком [лнрс]ёк
SFX O ек ьку [лнрс]ек
SFX O ёк ьку [лнрс]ёк
SFX O ел ла ел
SFX O ёл ла ёл
SFX O ел лам ел
SFX O ёл лам ёл
SFX O ел лами ел
SFX O ёл лами ёл
SFX O ел лах ел
SFX O ёл лах ёл
SFX O ел ле ел
SFX O ёл ле ёл
SFX O ел лов ел
SFX O ёл лов ёл
SFX O ел лом ел
SFX O ёл лом ёл
SFX O ел лу ел
SFX O ёл лу ёл
SFX O ел лы ел
SFX O ёл лы ёл
SFX O ень не ень
SFX O ень ней ень
SFX O ень нем ень
SFX O ень ни ень
SFX O ень ню ень
SFX O ень ня ень
SFX O ень ням ень
SFX O ень нями ень
SFX O ень нях ень
SFX O ец йца [аеио]ец
SFX O ец йцам [аеио]ец
SFX O ец йцами [аеио]ец
SFX O ец йцах [аеио]ец
SFX O ец йце [аеио]ец
SFX O ец йцев [аеи]ец
SFX O ец йцем [аеи]ец
SFX O ец йцу [аеио]ец
SFX O ец йцы [аеио]ец
SFX O ец ца [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец цам [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец цами [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец цах [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец це [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец цу [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец цы [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец ьца лец
SFX O ец ьцам лец
SFX O ец ьцами лец
SFX O ец ьцах лец
SFX O ец ьце лец
SFX O ец ьцу лец
SFX O ец ьцы лец
SFX O и ам [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O и ами [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O и ах [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O и ям [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O и ями [абеилнорсь]и
SFX O и ями [арс]ти
SFX O и ях [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O ий ье ий
SFX O ий ьего ий
SFX O ий ьей ий
SFX O ий ьем ий
SFX O ий ьему ий
SFX O ий ьи ий
SFX O ий ьим ий
SFX O ий ьими ий
SFX O ий ьих ий
SFX O ий ью ий
SFX O ий ья ий
SFX O ин ам ин
SFX O ин ами ин
SFX O ин ах ин
SFX O ин е нин
SFX O ин ы рин
SFX O нин н нин
SFX O ок ка ок
SFX O ок кам ок
SFX O ок ками ок
SFX O ок ках ок
SFX O ок ке ок
SFX O ок ки ок
SFX O ок ков ок
SFX O ок ком ок
SFX O ок ку ок
SFX O оть те оть
SFX O оть тей оть
SFX O оть тем оть
SFX O оть ти оть
SFX O оть тю оть
SFX O оть тя оть
SFX O оть тям оть
SFX O оть тями оть
SFX O оть тях оть
SFX O рин р рин
SFX O ы ам ы
SFX O ы ами ы
SFX O ы ах ы

SFX p Y 4
SFX p 0 ess ll
SFX p 0 less [^l]l
SFX p 0 less [^ly]
SFX p 0 less [aeiou]y

SFX P Y 4
SFX P 0 ness [^y]
SFX P 0 ness [aeiou]y
SFX P 0 ness's [^y]
SFX P 0 ness's [aeiou]y

SFX p Y 1
SFX p y iless [^aeiou]y

SFX P Y 14
SFX P y iness [^aeiou]y
SFX P y iness's [^aeiou]y
SFX P ить а [жчшщ]ить
SFX P ить я [^жчшщ]ить
SFX P иться ась [жчшщ]иться
SFX P иться ясь [^жчшщ]иться
SFX P ть я [^аеоу]ять
SFX P ть я [ае]ть
SFX P ться сь [аеоу]яться
SFX P ться ясь [^аеоу]яться
SFX P ться ясь [ае]ться
SFX P ыть оя ыть
SFX P ыться оясь ыться
SFX P ять я [аеоу]ять

SFX q Y 8
SFX q 0 isation [^aemsy]
SFX q 0 isation [^i]s
SFX q 0 isation [^u]m
SFX q 0 isation [aeiou]y
SFX q 0 isations [^aemsy]
SFX q 0 isations [^i]s
SFX q 0 isations [^u]m
SFX q 0 isations [aeiou]y

SFX Q Y 16
SFX Q 0 ise [^aemsy]
SFX Q 0 ise [^i]s
SFX Q 0 ise [^u]m
SFX Q 0 ise [aeiou]y
SFX Q 0 ised [^aemsy]
SFX Q 0 ised [^i]s
SFX Q 0 ised [^u]m
SFX Q 0 ised [aeiou]y
SFX Q 0 ises [^aemsy]
SFX Q 0 ises [^i]s
SFX Q 0 ises [^u]m
SFX Q 0 ises [aeiou]y
SFX Q 0 ising [^aemsy]
SFX Q 0 ising [^i]s
SFX Q 0 ising [^u]m
SFX Q 0 ising [aeiou]y

SFX q Y 2
SFX q 0 tisation a
SFX q 0 tisations a

SFX Q Y 4
SFX Q 0 tise a
SFX Q 0 tised a
SFX Q 0 tises a
SFX Q 0 tising a

SFX q Y 4
SFX q e isation [^l]e
SFX q e isation [aeiou]le
SFX q e isations [^l]e
SFX q e isations [aeiou]le

SFX Q Y 8
SFX Q e ise [^l]e
SFX Q e ise [aeiou]le
SFX Q e ised [^l]e
SFX Q e ised [aeiou]le
SFX Q e ises [^l]e
SFX Q e ises [aeiou]le
SFX Q e ising [^l]e
SFX Q e ising [aeiou]le

SFX q Y 2
SFX q le ilisation [^aeiou]le
SFX q le ilisations [^aeiou]le

SFX Q Y 4
SFX Q le ilise [^aeiou]le
SFX Q le ilised [^aeiou]le
SFX Q le ilises [^aeiou]le
SFX Q le ilising [^aeiou]le

SFX q Y 2
SFX q s sation is
SFX q s sations is

SFX Q Y 4
SFX Q s se is
SFX Q s sed is
SFX Q s ses is
SFX Q s sing is

SFX q Y 2
SFX q um isation um
SFX q um isations um

SFX Q Y 4
SFX Q um ise um
SFX Q um ised um
SFX Q um ises um
SFX Q um ising um

SFX q Y 2
SFX q y isation [^aeiou]y
SFX q y isations [^aeiou]y

SFX Q Y 10
SFX Q y ise [^aeiou]y
SFX Q y ised [^aeiou]y
SFX Q y ises [^aeiou]y
SFX Q y ising [^aeiou]y
SFX Q евать уя [жшщчц]евать
SFX Q евать юя [^жшщчц]евать
SFX Q еваться уясь [жшщчц]еваться
SFX Q еваться юясь [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX Q овать уя овать
SFX Q оваться уясь оваться

SFX R Y 7
SFX R 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX R 0 bers [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX R 0 ber's [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX R 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX R 0 ders [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX R 0 der's [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX R 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]

SFX r Y 1
SFX r 0 er [^aeiou][cl]

SFX R Y 1
SFX R 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]

SFX r Y 1
SFX r 0 er [^ecly]

SFX R Y 2
SFX R 0 er [^ey]
SFX R 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]

SFX r Y 1
SFX r 0 er [aeio][aeiou][cl]

SFX R Y 1
SFX R 0 er [aeio][eiou]l

SFX r Y 1
SFX r 0 er [aeiou]y

SFX R Y 4
SFX R 0 er [aeiou]y
SFX R 0 er [aeo]al
SFX R 0 ers [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX R 0 er's [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]

SFX r Y 2
SFX r 0 ers [^aeiou][cl]
SFX r 0 er's [^aeiou][cl]

SFX R Y 2
SFX R 0 ers [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX R 0 er's [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]

SFX r Y 2
SFX r 0 ers [^ecly]
SFX r 0 er's [^ecly]

SFX R Y 2
SFX R 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]
SFX R 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]

SFX r Y 2
SFX r 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX r 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][cl]

SFX R Y 2
SFX R 0 ers [aeio][eiou]l
SFX R 0 er's [aeio][eiou]l

SFX r Y 2
SFX r 0 ers [aeiou]y
SFX r 0 er's [aeiou]y

SFX R Y 10
SFX R 0 ers [aeiou]y
SFX R 0 er's [aeiou]y
SFX R 0 ers [aeo]al
SFX R 0 er's [aeo]al
SFX R 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX R 0 fers [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX R 0 fer's [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX R 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX R 0 gers [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX R 0 ger's [^aeio][aeiou]g

SFX r Y 1
SFX r 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c

SFX R Y 2
SFX R 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX R 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k

SFX r Y 2
SFX r 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX r 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c

SFX R Y 4
SFX R 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX R 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX R 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX R 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]k

SFX r Y 1
SFX r 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX R Y 2
SFX R 0 ler [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX R 0 ler [^aeo]al

SFX r Y 2
SFX r 0 lers [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX r 0 ler's [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX R Y 13
SFX R 0 lers [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX R 0 ler's [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX R 0 lers [^aeo]al
SFX R 0 ler's [^aeo]al
SFX R 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX R 0 mers [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX R 0 mer's [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX R 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX R 0 ners [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX R 0 ner's [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX R 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX R 0 pers [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX R 0 per's [^aeio][aeiou]p

SFX r Y 1
SFX r 0 r e

SFX R Y 4
SFX R 0 r e
SFX R 0 rer [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX R 0 rers [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX R 0 rer's [^aeio][aeiou]r

SFX r Y 2
SFX r 0 rs e
SFX r 0 r's e
